Washington statutes.
RCW 35A.16.040

Effective date of reduction.

Promptly after the filing of the abstract of votes with the secretary of state the legislative body shall adopt an ordinance defining and fixing the corporate limits after excluding the area as determined by the election. The ordinance shall also describe the excluded territory by metes and bounds or by reference to a recorded plat or government survey and declare it no longer a part of the code city.

[ 1967 ex.s. c 119 s 35A.16.040.]